District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.10

Condition of eligibility — Effect of failure to comply.

(a)

If an applicant or recipient claims good cause for noncooperation under § 4-217.09 and the Mayor determines that good cause does not exist, the applicant or recipient shall be notified and given an opportunity to cooperate, to withdraw the application for assistance, or to have the assistance case closed. Refusal to cooperate, after such notice and opportunity to cooperate, shall result in imposition of the sanctions provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

If an applicant for, or recipient of, assistance, who is the parent of the child with respect to whom assistance is claimed, fails to cooperate as required by § 4-217.08, and the Mayor has determined under § 4-217.09 that the applicant or recipient does not have good cause for noncooperation, the amount of the applicant’s or recipient’s public assistance grant shall be reduced by 25%.

(c)

If the applicant or recipient complies with § 4-217.08 after a determination of noncooperation, the IV-D agency shall promptly notify the agency administering assistance for the family. The agency administering assistance shall restore assistance to the applicant or recipient in the month following the date of cooperation.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1710, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(aaaa), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-217.10.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(w) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(w) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(aaaa) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(w) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(w) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(w) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(aaaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(aaaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(aaaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), § 2(aaaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
§ 2(aaaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270).